District of Columbia statutes.
36-501

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Private corporation” means any corporation, other than a public corporation, organized for the purpose of establishing, operating, and maintaining a foreign trade zone.

(2)

“Public corporation” means the District of Columbia government or an agency of the District of Columbia government or similar organization that is financed in whole or in part by public funds.

July 14, 1995, D.C. Law 11-28, § 2, 42 DCR 2569
1981 Ed., § 29-721.
2001 Ed., § 29-501.
This section is referenced in § 32-808.